Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1512
Petition; amendment; personal service.

(1) A petition to contest the election or challenge the qualifications of a member shall only be amended once within the time period for filing the initial petition under section 50-1511. An amended petition shall be filed with the Clerk of the Legislature and personally served on the respondent member and shall meet all the elements required for an initial petition.

(2) A petition which is filed or amended after the filing deadline in section 50-1511 or which fails to meet any of the requirements of the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act shall be void, and any rights related thereto shall expire by operation of law.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 19.